Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.195

Intercollegiate coaches—Minimum standards encouraged.

The state board for community and technical colleges in consultation with the Northwest athletic association of community colleges and other interested parties shall encourage community colleges to ensure that intercollegiate coaches meet the following minimum standards:

(1) Verification of up-to-date certification in first aid and cardiopulmonary resuscitation;

(2) Maintaining knowledge of Northwest athletic association of community colleges codes, rules, and institutional policy; and

(3) Encouragement of coaches to participate in appropriate in-service training and activities.

[ 1993 c 94 s 2.]

NOTES:

Policy—1993 c 94: "The legislature supports the establishment of minimum standards for intercollegiate coaches and a process to ensure the safety and appropriate skill development of student athletes." [ 1993 c 94 s 1.]